New Mexico, session 2026, SB234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the public education department for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 and subsequent fiscal years for the Albuquerque public school district to provide transportation to and from school for foster children. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund. .232569.1